South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 47 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 47-1-65. It is unlawful to knowingly and wilfully discharge fireworks less than two hundred yards from a facility housing equine. A person who violates this provision is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined two hundred fifty dollars. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----